src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX E o       an iosioms      o         
SFX E o       an i sias       o         
SFX E o       an iosiomis     o         
SFX E o       an iosiose      o         
SFX E i       intysis         [^s]i     
SFX E i       int j           [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iojo         [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iajam        [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iuoju        [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iajame       [^s]i     
SFX E i       intieji         [^s]i     
SFX E i       intiesiems      [^s]i     
SFX E i       in i j          [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iuosius      [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iaisiais     [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iuosiuose    [^s]i     
SFX E i       in ioji         [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iosios       [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iajai        [^s]i     
SFX E i       in i j          [^s]i     
SFX E i       in i ja         [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iojoj        [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iojoje       [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iosioms      [^s]i     
SFX E i       in i sias       [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iosiomis     [^s]i     
SFX E i       in iosiose      [^s]i     
SFX E i       intysis         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       int j           [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iojo         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iajam        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iuoju        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iajame       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intieji         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intiesiems      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in i j          [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iuosius      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iaisiais     [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iuosiuose    [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in ioji         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iosios       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iajai        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in i j          [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in i ja         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iojoj        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iojoje       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iosioms      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in i sias       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iosiomis     [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       in iosiose      [^aoi]si  
SFX E 0       mas             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mo              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mam             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       m               [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mu              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mame            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mi              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       m               [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miems           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mus             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mais            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muose           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       ma              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mos             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mai             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moje            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moj             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moms            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       momis           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mose            [aoi]     
SFX E si      masi            [aoi]si   
SFX E 0       mesnis          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnio          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniam         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniu          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniame        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesni           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesni           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniems        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnius         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniais        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniuose       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn s          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnei          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn je         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn j          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn ms         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn mis        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn se         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausias        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausio         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiam        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiu         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiame       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiems       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausius        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiais       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiuose      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausia         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausos         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiai        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausoje        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausoj         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausios        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausioms       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiomis      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiose       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       masis           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojo            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majam           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       m j             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muoju           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majame          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mieji           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       m j             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miesiems        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muosius         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       maisiais        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muosiuose       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moji            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosios          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majai           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       m j             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       m ja            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojoje          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojoj           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosioms         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       m sias          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosiomis        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosiose         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnysis        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniojo        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniajam       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesn j          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniuoju       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniajame      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnieji        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesni j         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniesiems     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniuosius     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniaisiais    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesnioji        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosios      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniajai       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesni j         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesni ja        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniojoje      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniojoj       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosioms     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniasias      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosiomis    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mesniosiose     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiasis      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiojo       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiajam      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi j        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiuoju      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiajame     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausieji       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi j        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiesiems    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiuosius    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausioji       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiosios     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiajai      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi j        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausi ja       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiojoje     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiojoj      [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiosioms    [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiasias     [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miausiosiose    [aoi]     
