src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
aik tijasi/E
aklioja/ENXl
alma/ENXd
angl ja/ENXak
apauga/DENX
apgrem ia/ENX
apibrinksta/ENX
apipurto/ENX
aprauda/ESX
apsigiria/ENX
apsikvailina/ESX
apsi eldina/ESX
ap eldina/ESX
asimiliuojasi/E
atid lioja/ENX
atitolsta/ENX
atmyli/ENX
atsigodi/ENX
atsilapoja/ESX
atsivo ia/ESX
aukoja/ESXfjkrv
avin ja/ENX
baisisi/E
balzgina/ENXl
bar kena/ENXf
b gdina/ENXd
bilda/ENXbdegijkl
bizija/ENX
blend ia/ENSXcfjkl
blyksi/ENXdfkw
braidina/ENX
brazda/ENXcdegkl
broliaujasi/E
br  uoja/ENXcefq
bumbsi/ENX
caksi/ENX
cingsi/ENXk
dabin ja/ESX
danginasi/E
dauginasi/E
d d iuoja/ENX
deleguoja/ENX
dergia/ENSXadefjklmprtvw
dezorganizuojasi/E
dilgina/ENXc
dirvonuoja/ENXd
dylin ja/ENX
draiko/ENSXadefjklmpqrvx
dr gnina/ENX
drimbina/ENXd
dro tel ja/ENX
d ja/ENXa
dumbluoja/ESXdkpw
duriasi/E
dvelksi/ENX
d iaugiasi/E
eiguliauja/ENX
engiasi/E
fig ruoja/ENX
gaidrija/ESX
galabijasi/E
garank t jasi/E
g s ioja/ENX
geba/DENXk
geltonina/ENX
gestel ja/ENX
ginkluoja/ESXaemq
gybsta/ENX
glam uoja/ESX
gliaudosi/E
glumina/ENX
gob auja/ENX
graibsto/ENSXabcdefhijkmnpqrvw
grebezoja/ENX
griauna/ENSXacdefgklouvwx
gri na/ENXacdefgkl
gro isi/E
guboja/DESX
gumbuojasi/E
g rin ja/ENX
gvildena/ENXdf
ie kin ja/ENX
individualizuoja/ENX
internacionalizuojasi/E
i ai o/ESX
i dausina/ENX
i gula/DENX
i kniausia/ENX
i miklina/ESX
i pliko/ENPSX
i sibodi/ENX
i sigari/ESX
i silaipina/ESX
i siplau oja/ESX
i si em ja/ESX
itempiasi/E
jauninasi/E
junko/ENPXbcefj
kabaruojasi/ENX
kaistel ja/ENX
kalk ja/ENXkl
kandidatuojasi/E
kardina/ENXf
kar ta/ENXdehj
kasuoja/ENX
kaustosi/E
kek ja/ENX
kepin ja/ENX
ker tauja/ENX
kiauksi/ENXk
kiloja/ENXdefhjkl
kiog dina/ENX
ki kiakop stauja/ENX
kyri/ENXaf
klaptel ja/ENX
klei ioja/ENX
kliaunasi/E
kli stel ja/ENX
klyksi/ENX
kluipina/ENX
knapso/ENX
kniaupiasi/E
kniurvina/ESXiu
kompelktuojasi/E
konkretizuoja/ENSXfkpw
koptel ja/ENX
kram iojasi/E
kratosi/E
kreka/ENXk
kriauk tel ja/ENX
kri kuoja/ENX
kr muojasi/E
kuitin ja/ESX
kult r ja/ENXk
kuopia/ENXdefk
kurkuliuoja/ENX
kvai ina/ENXa
kvar ina/ENXdfj
kvimpa/ENXefhjkl
laikosi/E
lala/ENXd
la ena/ENX
lazga/ENX
lengvina/ENSXfqr
liaud ja/ENXk
likdo/ENX
lip n ja/ENXk
lydosi/E
lo iasi/E
magnetina/ENXd
mala/ENSXcdfhijkopruvw
mank tinasi/E
maskuoja/ESXlx
maus ioja/ENX
megzdina/ENX
memena/ENX
mezgasi/E
miksi/ENXk
mirkso/ENX
modernina/ENXk
mostikuoja/ENX
murgdosi/E
m soja/ENXa
narsina/ENX
neria/ENSXcdefhijklpqrwx
niauroja/ENXk
ni ra/DENXfk
norisi/E
nudreskia/ESX
nuknamba/ENX
nuomojasi/E
nusibr  ia/ESX
nusilaisina/ESX
nusivad ja/ENX
nutvilko/ENPSX
orkestruoja/ENX
pa iau o/ESX
paglem ia/ENX
pajamuoja/ENXl
paklysta/ESX
palenda/ESX
pamplina/ENX
papli pi/ENX
parsiaitoja/ESX
pa ali/ENX
pasi iumpa/ESX
pasigro  ja/ESX
pasik k ioja/ESX
pasiraivo/ENX
pasi oki/ESX
pasivydi/ESX
pa oka/ESX
pata ko/ESX
paveiksluoja/ESX
p dina/ENXbcdegi
perginkluoja/ENX
pers da/ENX
pe ioja/ENXekl
piktd iugiauja/ENX
pinoja/ENX
pypsi/ENXfk
plaukin ja/ENX
plepasi/E
pliauk i/ENXk
pliump ioja/ENX
pliu kuoja/ENX
plumpsi/ENX
poliruoja/ENX
pradaigina/ESX
pra auna/ENX
prasivard iuoja/ESX
presuoja/ENXk
prievartauja/ENXd
prik pa/ENX
prireikia/ESX
prisigliaudo/ESX
prisime kerioja/ESX
prisispie ia/ENX
prisi moni/ENX
pritirpdo/ESX
profiliuoja/ENX
pudruoja/ESXefqr
pumpuoja/ENXdhj
purpso/ENX
p slioja/ENX
raibuliuoja/ENXk
rai osi/E
ranka/DENXi
raug ja/ENXl
r  osi/E
r kauja/ENXfp
reorganizuoja/ENX
revizuoja/ENX
riebaluojasi/E
rinkin ja/ENX
ryk ta/ENXd
r gina/ENX
r pi/ENSXf
r zlina/ENX
salina/ENX
sargauja/ENX
sega/ENSXabcdefjklnopqrvwx
s lin ja/ENX
siaustel ja/ENX
simbolizuoja/ENSX
siunta/DENXabcfhlopv
skaidrinasi/E
skandina/ENX
sk  iojasi/E
sk triojasi/E
skystuoja/ENX
skoni/ESX
skuba/DENXbcdefgjkl
slankin ja/ENX
slistel ja/ENX
smakso/ENX
smenga/ENXceik
smulkina/ENSXfkr
sociologizuoja/ENX
spauduojasi/E
spinta/DENSXak
spragina/ENXk
sprogtel ja/ENX
sri bauja/ENX
stand ja/ENXfk
stengiasi/E
stygsta/ENXe
strapalin ja/ENX
st gauja/ENXf
suasmenina/ENX
s do/ENXacdehjkl
sugobia/ESX
sukin jasi/E
sukrunta/ENX
sumakoja/ESX
sunkina/ENSXafmrv
suprielinksn ja/ENX
su auna/ENX
susidro in ja/ESX
susikerta/ENX
susimausto/ESX
susipinklioja/ESX
susi neka/ENSX
susi eid ia/ESX
suspraud ia/ESX
sutvardo/ESX
su vangsta/ENX
sveikuoja/ENX
svyruliuoja/ENX
talkin ja/ENX
tap noja/ENXf
ta ko/ENXj
teikia/ENSXcefhjkoqtv
tel ia/ENXfj
terminuoja/ENX
tiesina/ENXf
tinginiauja/ENXfi
tir tina/ENXefk
tyrin ja/ENXdf
traktuoja/ENX
trata/ENXbcdegikl
trepsin ja/ENX
trililiuoja/ENX
triu kina/ENXk
truksi/ENX
t pauja/ENX
tursta/ENX
tvankstosi/E
tvirksta/ENXdfi
uja/ENXdfkl
urpia/ENX
u dobia/ESX
u kempa/ENX
u lopo/ESX
u saldina/ESX
u sikalba/ENX
u siplieskia/ENX
u sl gia/ENX
u  vengia/ENX
vaidijasi/E
vaiskina/ENX
vali kauja/ENX
vanoja/ESXdepq
varnauja/ENX
v dinasi/E
vel n ja/ENX
v pso/ENX
ve ioja/ENSXadefjklvw
vilnina/ENX
viskina/ENX
votuloja/ENXk
zv goja/ENX
